sl-SI: Uporaba ušesnih čepkov: Streljanje; Spanje; Plavanje; Drugo
fi: Korvatulppien käyttö: Ammunta; Nukkuminen; Uinti; Muu
it: Utilizzo dei tappi per le orecchie: Tiro; Dormire; Nuoto; Altro
da: Brug af ørepropper: Skydning; Søvn; Svømning; Andet
vi: Sử dụng nút tai: Chụp; Ngủ; Bơi; Khác
ja: 耳栓の用途: 射撃; 睡眠; スイミング; その他
th: ใช้ที่อุดหู: ยิงปืน; นอนหลับ; ว่ายน้ำ; อื่นๆ
el: Χρήση ωτοασπίδας: Σκοποβολή; Ύπνος; Κολύμπι; Άλλο
pt-PT: Utilização de tampão para ouvido: Tiro; A dormir; Natação; Outro
ru: Применение берушей: Стрельба; Сон; Плавание; Другой
zh-TW: 耳塞用途: 射擊; 睡眠; 游泳; 其他
de: Ohrstöpselverwendung: Schießen; Schlafen; Schwimmen; Sonstiges
ko: 귀마개 용도: 사격; 수면; 수영; 기타
es: Uso de tapones para los oídos: Tiro; Dormir; Natación; Otros
pt-BR: Uso do protetor de ouvido: Tiro esportivo; Noturna; Natação; Outro
nb: Bruk av ørepropper: Skyting; Soving; Svømming; Annet
cs: Použití špuntů do uší: Střelba; Spaní; Plavání; Jiné
sv: Användning av öronproppar: Skytte; Sovande; Simning; Övrigt
nl: Gebruik oordopjes: Schieten; Slapen; Zwemmen; Andere
en: Earplug use: Shooting; Sleeping; Swimming; Other
tr: Kulak tıkacı kullanımı: Atıcılık; Uyuma; Yüzme; Diğer
fr: Utilisation des bouchons d’oreilles: Tournage; Nuit; Natation; Autre
zh-CN: 耳塞使用: 射击; 睡眠; 游泳用品; 其他
hr-HR: Namjena čepića za uši: Pucanje; Spavanje; Plivanje; Ostalo
hu: Füldugó használata: Lövés; Alvás; Úszás; Egyéb
sk-SK: Použitie štupľov do uší: Streľba; Spanie; Plávanie; Iné
pl: Zastosowanie zatyczek do uszu: Strzelanie; Na sen; Pływanie; Inne
lt-LT: Ausų kištukų paskirtis: Šaudymas; Miegas; Plaukimas; Kita
ro-RO: Utilizare dopuri de urechi: Tir; Dormit; Înot; Altele
bg-BG: Използване на тапа за уши: Стрелба; Спане; Плуване; Други